California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The order shall provide that the owner, within 15 days of receipt of the notice, may request a hearing before the president of the board to contest the cease and desist order. Consideration of the owner’s contest of the cease and desist order shall comply with Section 11425.10 of the Government Code. The hearing shall be held no later than five business days from the date the request of the owner is received by the board. The president shall render a written decision within five business days of the hearing. In the absence of the president of the board, the vice president of the board may conduct the hearing permitted by this subdivision. The owner or person in possession or control of the pharmacy may seek review of the decision of the president of the board pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Failure to comply with a cease and
 desist order issued pursuant to this section shall be unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 19.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of this article, or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, may subject the person or entity that committed the violation to a fine of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per occurrence pursuant to a citation issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Section operative September 5, 2002, pursuant to Section 4127.6.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.6.

This article shall become operative upon the allocation of positions to the board for the implementation of the provisions of this article in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Note: The condition in this section for operation of Article 7.5 (comm. with Section 4127), was satisfied on September 5, 2002, when Stats. 2002, Ch. 379, took effect.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.7.

The board may, at its discretion, issue a temporary license to compound sterile drug products upon the conditions and for any periods of time as the board determines to be in the public interest. A temporary license fee shall be required in an amount established by the board as specified in subdivision (u) of Section 4400. When needed to protect public safety, a temporary license may be issued for a period not to exceed 180 days, and may be issued subject to terms and conditions the board deems necessary. If the board determines a temporary license was issued by mistake or denies the application for a permanent license, the temporary license shall terminate upon either personal service of the notice of termination upon the licenseholder or service by certified mail, return receipt requested at the licenseholder’s address of record with the board,
 whichever comes first. Neither for purposes of retaining a temporary license nor for purposes of any disciplinary or license denial proceeding before the board shall the temporary licenseholder be deemed to have a vested property right or interest in the license.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4127.8 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 649, Sec. 2.   (SB 510)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.8.

(a) A pharmacy licensed pursuant to Section 4127.1 or 4127.2 that issues a recall notice regarding a sterile compounded drug shall, in addition to any other duties, contact the recipient pharmacy, prescriber, or patient of the recalled drug and the board as soon as possible within 12 hours of the recall notice if both of the following apply:

(1) Use of or exposure to the recalled drug may cause serious adverse health consequences or death.

(2) The recalled drug was dispensed, or is intended for use, in this state.

(b) A recall notice issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made as follows:

(1) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to the patient, the notice shall be made to the patient.

(2) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to the prescriber, the notice shall be made to the prescriber, who shall ensure the patient is notified.

(3) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to a pharmacy, the notice shall be made to the pharmacy, who shall notify the prescriber or patient, as appropriate. If the pharmacy notifies the prescriber, the prescriber shall ensure the patient is notified.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4127.9 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 649, Sec. 3.   (SB 510)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.6. Centralized Hospital Packaging Pharmacies [4128. - 4128.7.]

4128.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4029, a centralized hospital packaging pharmacy may prepare medications, by performing the following specialized functions, for administration only to inpatients within its own general acute care hospital and one or more general acute care hospitals if the hospitals are under common ownership and located within a 75-mile radius of each other:

(1) Preparing unit dose packages for single administration to inpatients from bulk containers, if each unit dose package is barcoded pursuant to Section 4128.4.

(2) Preparing sterile compounded unit dose drugs for administration to inpatients, if each compounded unit dose drug is barcoded pursuant to Section 4128.4.

(3) Preparing compounded unit dose drugs for administration to inpatients, if each unit dose package is barcoded pursuant to Section 4128.4.

(b) For purposes of this article, “common ownership” means that the ownership information on file with the board pursuant to Section 4201 for the licensed pharmacy is consistent with the ownership information on file with the board for the other licensed pharmacy or pharmacies for purposes of preparing medications pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (AB 486)   Effective September 2, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.2.

(a) In addition to the pharmacy license requirement described in Section 4110, a centralized hospital packaging pharmacy shall obtain a specialty license from the board prior to engaging in the functions described in Section 4128.

(b) An applicant seeking a specialty license pursuant to this article shall apply to the board on forms established by the board.

(c) Before issuing the specialty license, the board shall inspect the pharmacy and ensure that the pharmacy is in compliance with this article and regulations established by the board.

(d) A
 license to perform the functions described in Section 4128 may only be issued to a pharmacy that is licensed by the board as a hospital pharmacy.

(e) A license issued pursuant to this article shall be renewed annually and is not transferrable.

(f) An applicant seeking renewal of a specialty license shall apply to the board on forms established by the board.

(g) A license to perform the functions described in Section 4128 shall not be renewed until the pharmacy has been inspected by the board and found to be in compliance with this article and regulations established by the board.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 9.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.3.

A centralized hospital packaging pharmacy may prepare and store a limited quantity of the unit dose drugs authorized by Section 4128 in advance of receipt of a patient-specific prescription in a quantity as is necessary to ensure continuity of care for an identified population of inpatients of the general acute care hospital based on a documented history of prescriptions for that patient population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 377)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.4.

(a) Any unit dose medication produced by a centralized hospital packaging pharmacy shall be barcoded to be machine readable at the inpatient’s bedside using barcode medication administration software.

(b) The barcode medication administration software shall permit health care practitioners to ensure that, before a medication is administered to an inpatient, it is the right medication, for the right inpatient, in the right dose, and via the right route of administration. The software shall verify that the medication satisfies these criteria by reading the barcode on the medication and comparing the information retrieved to the electronic medical record of the inpatient.

(c) For purposes of this section, “barcode medication administration software” means a computerized system designed to prevent medication errors in health care settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 241, Sec. 2.   (AB 486)   Effective September 2, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.5.

(a) Any label for each unit dose medication produced by a centralized hospital packaging pharmacy shall display a human-readable label that contains all of the following:

(1) The date that the medication was prepared.

(2) The beyond-use date.

(3) The established name of the drug.

(4) The quantity of each active ingredient.

(5) Special storage or handling requirements.

(6) The lot number or control number assigned by the centralized hospital packaging pharmacy.

(7) The name of the centralized hospital packaging pharmacy.

(b) For quality
 control and investigative purposes, a pharmacist shall be able to retrieve all of the following information using the lot number or control number described in subdivision (a):

(1) The components used in the drug product.

(2) The expiration date of each of the drug’s components.

(3) The National Drug Code Directory number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 241, Sec. 3.   (AB 486)   Effective September 2, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.6.

All compounding and packaging functions specified in Section 4128 shall be performed only in the licensed centralized hospital packaging pharmacy and that pharmacy shall comply with all applicable federal and state statutes and regulations, including, but not limited to, regulations regarding compounding and, when appropriate, sterile compounding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 28.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.7.

A centralized hospital packaging pharmacy and the pharmacists working in the pharmacy shall be responsible for the integrity, potency, quality, and labeled strength of any unit dose drug product prepared by the centralized hospital packaging pharmacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 377)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.7. Outsourcing Facilities [4129. - 4129.9.]

4129.

(a) A facility registered as an outsourcing facility with the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) shall be concurrently licensed with the board as an outsourcing facility if it compounds sterile medication or nonsterile medication for nonpatient-specific distribution within or into California.

(b) A facility premises licensed with the board as a sterile compounding pharmacy shall not be concurrently licensed with the board as an outsourcing facility at the same location.

(c) The board may adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to establish policies, guidelines,
 and procedures to implement this article.

(d) The board shall review any formal requirements or guidance documents developed by the FDA regarding outsourcing facilities within 90 days after their release in order to determine whether revisions are necessary for any regulations promulgated by the board.

(e) An outsourcing facility licensed by the board dispensing patient-specific compounded preparations pursuant to a prescription for an individual patient shall not be required to be licensed as a pharmacy, but shall otherwise comply with the same requirements of a pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 20.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.1.

(a) An outsourcing facility that is licensed with the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and with an address in this state shall also be licensed by the board as an outsourcing facility before doing business within this state. The license shall be renewed annually and is not transferable.

(b) An outsourcing facility shall compound all sterile products and nonsterile products in compliance with regulations issued by the board and with federal current good manufacturing practices applicable to outsourcing facilities.

(c) An outsourcing facility license shall not be issued or renewed until the location is inspected by the board and
 found in compliance with this article and regulations adopted by the board.

(d) An outsourcing facility license shall not be issued or renewed until the board does all of the following:

(1) Prior to inspection, reviews a current copy of the outsourcing facility’s policies and procedures for sterile compounding and nonsterile compounding.

(2) Is provided with copies of all federal and state regulatory agency inspection reports, as well as accreditation reports, and certification reports of facilities or equipment of the outsourcing facility’s premises conducted in the prior 12 months.

(3) Prior to inspection, receives a list of all sterile drugs and nonsterile drugs compounded by the outsourcing facility as reported to the FDA in the last 12 months.

(e) An outsourcing facility licensed pursuant to this section shall provide the board with all of the following:

(1) A copy of any disciplinary or other action taken by another state or the FDA within 10 days of the action.

(2) Notice within 24 hours of any recall notice issued by the outsourcing facility.

(3) A copy of any clinically related complaint it receives involving an outsourcing facility’s compounded products from or involving any provider, pharmacy, or patient in California within 72 hours of receipt.

(4) Notice within 24 hours after learning of adverse effects reported or potentially attributable to the outsourcing facility’s products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.2.

(a) An outsourcing facility that is licensed with the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) as an outsourcing facility and has an address outside of this state but in the United States of America is a nonresident outsourcing facility. A nonresident outsourcing facility shall not compound sterile drug products or nonsterile drug products for distribution or use into this state without an outsourcing license issued by the board pursuant to this section. The license shall be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(b) A nonresident outsourcing facility shall compound all sterile products and nonsterile products to be distributed or used in this state in compliance with regulations of the
 board and with federal current good manufacturing practices applicable to outsourcing facilities.

(c) A license for a nonresident outsourcing facility shall not be issued or renewed until the location is inspected by the board and found in compliance with this article and any regulations adopted by the board. The nonresident outsourcing facility shall reimburse the board for all actual and necessary costs incurred by the board in conducting an inspection of the nonresident outsourcing facility at least once annually pursuant to subdivision (x) of Section 4400.

(d) A license for a nonresident outsourcing facility shall not be issued or renewed until the board:

(1) Prior to inspection, reviews a current copy of the nonresident outsourcing facility’s policies and procedures for sterile compounding and nonsterile
 compounding.

(2) (A) Is provided with copies of all federal and state regulatory agency inspection reports, as well as accreditation reports, and certification reports of facilities or equipment of the nonresident outsourcing facility’s premises conducted in the prior 12 months.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “state” refers to the state in which the nonresident outsourcing facility resides.

(3) Prior to inspection, receives a list of all sterile drug products and nonsterile drug products compounded by the pharmacy as reported to the FDA within the prior 12 months.

(e) A nonresident outsourcing facility licensed pursuant to this section shall provide the board with all of the following:

(1) A copy of any disciplinary or other action taken by another state or the FDA within 10 days of the action.

(2) Notice within 24 hours of any recall notice issued by the nonresident outsourcing facility.

(3) A copy of any complaint it receives involving an outsourcing facility’s compounded products from or involving any provider, pharmacy, or patient in California within 72 hours of receipt.

(4) Notice within 24 hours after learning of adverse effects reported or potentially attributable to a nonresident outsourcing facility’s products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.3.

(a) On or before January 1, 2018, the board shall provide a report to the Legislature regarding the regulation of nonresident outsourcing facilities. The report shall be submitted to the Legislature in the manner required pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. At a minimum, the report shall address all of the following:

(1) A detailed description of board activities related to the inspection and licensure of nonresident outsourcing facilities.

(2) Whether fee revenue collected pursuant to subdivision (x) of Section 4400 and travel cost reimbursements collected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4129.2 provide revenue in an
 amount sufficient to support the board’s activities related to the inspection and licensure of nonresident outsourcing facilities.

(3) The status of proposed changes to federal law that are under serious consideration and that would govern outsourcing facilities and compounding pharmacies, including, but not limited to, legislation pending before Congress, administrative rules, regulations or orders under consideration by the FDA or other appropriate federal agency, and cases pending before the courts.

(4) If applicable, recommended modifications to the board’s statutory duties related to nonresident outsourcing facilities as a result of changes to federal law or any additional modifications necessary to protect the health and safety of the public.

(b) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision
 (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.4.

(a) Whenever the board has a reasonable belief, based on information obtained during an inspection or investigation by the board, that an outsourcing facility compounding sterile drug products or nonsterile drug products poses an immediate threat to the public health or safety, the executive officer of the board may issue an order to the outsourcing facility to immediately cease and desist compounding sterile drug products or nonsterile drug products. The cease and desist order shall remain in effect for no more than 30 days or the date of a hearing seeking an interim suspension order, whichever is earlier.

(b) Whenever the board issues a cease and desist order pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall immediately issue a notice to the owner setting forth the
 acts or omissions with which the owner is charged, specifying the pertinent code section or sections and any regulations.

(c) The cease and desist order shall state that the owner, within 15 days of receipt of the notice, may request a hearing before the president of the board to contest the cease and desist order. Consideration of the owner’s contest of the cease and desist order shall comply with Section 11425.10 of the Government Code. The hearing shall be held no later than five business days after the date the request of the owner is received by the board. The president shall render a written decision within five business days after the hearing. In the absence of the president of the board, the vice president of the board may conduct the hearing permitted by this subdivision. The owner or person in possession or control of the outsourcing facility may seek review of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(d) Failure to comply with a cease and desist order issued pursuant to this section shall be unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 21.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, a violation of this article, or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, may subject the person or entity that committed the violation to a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per occurrence pursuant to a citation issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.8.

The board, at its discretion, may issue a temporary license to an outsourcing facility upon the conditions and for any periods of time as the board determines to be in the public interest. A temporary license fee shall be required as specified in subdivision (w) of Section 4400. When needed to protect public safety, a temporary license may be issued for a period not to exceed 180 days, and may be issued subject to terms and conditions the board deems necessary. If the board determines a temporary license was issued by mistake or denies the application for a permanent license, the temporary license shall terminate upon the earlier of personal service of the notice of termination upon the licenseholder or service by certified mail with return receipt requested at the licenseholder’s
 address of record with the board. The temporary licenseholder shall not be deemed to have a vested property right or interest in the license for purposes of retaining a temporary license or for purposes of any disciplinary or license denial proceeding before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.9.

(a) An outsourcing facility licensed pursuant to Section 4129.1 or 4129.2 that issues a recall notice for a sterile drug or nonsterile drug compounded by the outsourcing facility, in addition to any other duties, shall contact the recipient pharmacy, prescriber, or patient of the recalled drug and the board as soon as possible within 24 hours of the recall notice if both of the following apply:

(1) Use of or exposure to the recalled drug may cause serious adverse health consequences or death.

(2) The recalled drug was dispensed, or is intended for use, in this state.

(b) A
 recall notice issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made as follows:

(1) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to the prescriber, the notice shall be made to the prescriber and the prescriber shall ensure the patient is notified.

(2) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to a pharmacy, the notice shall be made to the pharmacy and that pharmacy shall notify the prescriber or patient, as appropriate. If the pharmacy notifies the prescriber, the prescriber shall ensure the patient is notified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 29.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Telepharmacy Systems and Remote Dispensing Site Pharmacies [4130. - 4135.]

4130.

(a) A telepharmacy system shall be used for the dispensing of prescription drugs and providing related drug regimen review and patient counseling services at a remote dispensing site pharmacy.

(b) If all of the requirements of this article and other relevant provisions of this chapter are met, the board shall issue a remote dispensing site pharmacy license for the purpose of increasing access to dispensing or pharmaceutical care services in the geographic area in which the remote dispensing site pharmacy is to be located.

(c) (1) A remote dispensing site pharmacy shall only be located in
 a medically underserved area unless otherwise approved by the board. For purposes of this section, a “medically underserved area” means a location that does not have a pharmacy that serves the general public within 10 road miles of the remote dispensing site.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a pharmacy serving the general public is later established within 10 road miles of a remote dispensing site pharmacy, the remote dispensing site pharmacy may continue to operate.

(d) A remote dispensing site pharmacy shall only be staffed by pharmacists or pharmacy technicians, or both, and shall not employ any unlicensed personnel.

(e) A remote dispensing site pharmacy license shall be issued only to the supervising pharmacy. A
 supervising pharmacy shall not obtain more than one remote dispensing site pharmacy license.

(f) A remote dispensing site pharmacy shall not be operated by the state and shall not be located in any state facility, including, but not limited to, correctional facilities, state hospitals, or developmental centers. This section shall not be construed to preclude a pharmacist who is otherwise eligible to operate a remote dispensing site pharmacy pursuant to this section from leasing space in property owned by the state, provided it is not for the purpose of serving individuals otherwise served by pharmacists and pharmacy technicians employed by the state.

(g) A remote dispensing site pharmacy shall not be located or operated for the purpose of displacing state employees.

(h) If a remote dispensing site pharmacy dispenses more than 225 prescriptions per day, calculated each calendar year, it shall cease to be a remote dispensing site pharmacy and may become a full-service pharmacy licensed under Section 4110 with a pharmacist onsite if it meets all the requirements for licensure for a pharmacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 7.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4131.

(a) A supervising pharmacy shall provide telepharmacy services for only one remote dispensing site pharmacy.

(b) A supervising pharmacy shall not be located greater than 150 road miles from a remote dispensing site pharmacy, unless otherwise approved by the board.

(c) A supervising pharmacy and remote dispensing site pharmacy shall be under common ownership.

(d) Unless staffed by a pharmacist, a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall be staffed by at least one registered pharmacy technician meeting the qualifications of Section 4132. A technician shall
 remain under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist at the supervising pharmacy at all times that the remote dispensing site pharmacy is operational. For the purposes of this article, direct supervision and control does not require the pharmacist to be physically present at the remote dispensing site pharmacy, but the pharmacist shall use a telepharmacy system to supervise operations through audio and visual technology from the supervising pharmacy.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist may serve as the pharmacist-in-charge for a pharmacy in addition to serving as pharmacist-in-charge of a supervising pharmacy. The designated pharmacist-in-charge of the supervising pharmacy shall also serve as the designated pharmacist-in-charge at the remote dispensing site pharmacy.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the pharmacist-in-charge of the remote dispensing site pharmacy and the pharmacist-on-duty at the supervising pharmacy shall be responsible for ensuring that both the supervising pharmacy and remote dispensing site pharmacy are sufficiently staffed to allow for appropriate supervision, which is supervision that would not be reasonably expected to result in an unreasonable risk of harm to public health, safety, or welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 7.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4132.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 4202, a pharmacy technician shall satisfy each of the following requirements before working at a remote dispensing site pharmacy:

(1) Possess a pharmacy technician license that is in good standing.

(2) Possess and maintain a certification issued by a board-approved pharmacy technician certification program.

(3) Possess one of the following:

(A) A minimum of an associate degree in pharmacy technology.

(B) A minimum of a bachelor’s degree in any subject.

(C) A certificate of completion from a course of training specified by regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4202.

(4) Complete a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience working as a pharmacy technician within the two years preceding first commencing work in the remote dispensing site pharmacy.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 4115, a registered pharmacy technician may perform order entry, packaging, manipulative, repetitive, and other nondiscretionary tasks at a remote dispensing site pharmacy under the supervision of a pharmacist at a supervising pharmacy using a telepharmacy system.

(c) A pharmacy technician at a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall not do any of the following:

(1) Receive a new prescription order orally from a prescriber or other person authorized to prescribe by law.

(2) Consult with a patient or their agent regarding a prescription, either before or after dispensing, or regarding any medical information contained in a patient medication record system or patient chart.

(3) Identify, evaluate, or interpret a prescription.

(4) Interpret the clinical data in a patient medication record system or patient chart.

(5) Consult with any prescriber, nurse, or other health care professional or authorized agent thereof.

(6) Supervise the packaging of drugs and check the packaging procedure and product upon completion.

(7) Perform any function that requires the professional judgment of a licensed pharmacist.

(8) Compound drug preparations.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 4115, a pharmacist at a supervising pharmacy may supervise up to two pharmacy technicians at each remote dispensing site pharmacy. This subdivision shall not be construed to alter a pharmacist’s ability to also supervise pharmacy technicians at the supervising pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   (AB 690)   Effective October 9, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4133.

(a) A telepharmacy system shall maintain a video and audio communication system that provides for effective communication between the supervising pharmacy and the remote dispensing site pharmacy’s personnel and patients.

(b) A telepharmacy system shall facilitate adequate pharmacist supervision and allow the appropriate exchange of visual, verbal, and written communications for patient counseling and other matters involved in the lawful dispensing of drugs.

(c) Patient counseling shall be provided using audio-visual communication prior to all prescriptions being dispensed from a remote dispensing site
 pharmacy.

(d) A telepharmacy system shall be able to do all of the following:

(1) Identify and record the pharmacy technician preparing each prescription and the supervising pharmacist who reviewed and authorized the dispensing of the prescription.

(2) Require a pharmacist to review and compare the electronic image of any new prescription presented at the remote dispensing site pharmacy with the data entry record of the prescription.

(3) Require the pharmacy technician to use barcode technology to verify the accuracy of the drug to be dispensed.

(4) Require remote visual confirmation by a pharmacist at the
 supervising pharmacy of the drug stock bottle and the drug to be dispensed prior to dispensing.

(5) Ensure that a prescription is not sold or delivered to a patient prior to a pharmacist performing final verification of the accuracy of the prescription and releasing the prescription for sale and delivery.

(e) The video and audio communication system used to counsel and interact with each patient or patient’s caregiver shall be secure and compliant with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (Public Law 104-191).

(f) All records of prescriptions dispensed including the records of the actions performed through the telepharmacy system shall be maintained at the remote dispensing
 site pharmacy and shall be maintained for three years after the filling of the prescription.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 7.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4134.

(a) A pharmacist from the supervising pharmacy shall complete a monthly in-person, self-inspection of each remote dispensing site pharmacy using a form designated by the board and shall retain all inspection reports.

(b) A perpetual inventory shall be kept for all controlled substances stored at a remote dispensing site pharmacy.

(c) All controlled substances at a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall be stored in a secure cabinet or safe that is locked.

(d) A pharmacist from the supervising pharmacy shall perform inventory and inventory
 reconciliation functions at a remote dispensing site pharmacy to detect and prevent the loss of any controlled substance.

(e) The pharmacist-in-charge of a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall review all inventory and inventory reconciliation reports taken and shall establish and maintain secure methods to prevent losses of any controlled substance. The board shall develop written policies and procedures for performing the inventory reconciliation reports required by this section.

(f) A pharmacist from the supervising pharmacy shall compile an inventory reconciliation report of all Schedule II controlled substances at a remote dispensing site pharmacy at least once every three months. This compilation shall require all of the following:

(1) A physical count, not an estimate, of all quantities of Schedule II controlled substances at the remote dispensing site pharmacy. The biennial inventory of controlled substances as required under federal law may serve as one of the mandated inventories under this section in the year that the federal biennial inventory is performed, provided that the biennial inventory was taken no more than three months from the last inventory required by this section.

(2) A review of all acquisitions and dispositions of Schedule II controlled substances since the last inventory reconciliation report.

(3) A comparison of paragraphs (1) and (2) in order to determine if there are any variances.

(4) All records used to
 compile each inventory reconciliation report shall be maintained in the remote dispensing site pharmacy for at least three years in a readily retrievable form.

(g) A remote dispensing site pharmacy shall report to the board, in writing, any identified losses of controlled substances and possible causes of the loss within 30 days of discovering the loss unless the cause of loss is theft, diversion, or self-use in which case the report shall be made within 14 days of discovering the loss. If the remote dispensing site pharmacy is unable to identify the cause of the loss, the remote dispensing site pharmacy shall undertake further investigation to identify the cause of the loss and security improvements necessary to prevent any additional losses of controlled substances. The pharmacist-in-charge shall be responsible for submitting the report to
 the board.

(h) Possible causes of overages shall be identified in writing and incorporated into the inventory reconciliation report.

(i) The inventory reconciliation report shall be dated and signed by the individual or individuals performing the inventory and countersigned by the pharmacist-in-charge of the remote dispensing site pharmacy. A countersignature shall not be required if the pharmacist-in-charge personally completed the inventory reconciliation report. The inventory reconciliation report shall be maintained in the remote dispensing site pharmacy for at least three years in a readily retrievable form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 7.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4135.

(a) While closed, a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall utilize an alarm or other comparable monitoring system to protect its equipment, records, and supply of drugs, devices, and other restricted sale items from unauthorized access, acquisition, or use.

(b) Unless a pharmacist is present at the remote dispensing site pharmacy, a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall not be open or its employees allowed access to it during times the supervising pharmacy is closed. The security system shall allow for tracking of entries into the remote dispensing site pharmacy and the pharmacist-in-charge shall periodically review the record of entries.
 Pharmacy services shall not be provided at a remote dispensing site pharmacy if the telepharmacy system is unavailable.

(c) The remote dispensing site pharmacy shall retain a recording of facility surveillance, excluding patient communications, for a minimum of 120 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 7.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Hypodermic Needles and Syringes [4141. - 4149.]

4141.

No person shall furnish hypodermic needles or syringes, by sale or otherwise, without a license issued by the board, except as otherwise provided by this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4143.

This article shall not apply to the sale of hypodermic syringes and needles at wholesale by pharmacies, drug wholesalers, drug manufacturers or manufacturers and dealers in surgical instruments to pharmacies, physicians, dentists, podiatrists, veterinarians, or persons to whom a license has been issued under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4144.5.

A person may sell or obtain hypodermic needles and hypodermic syringes without a prescription or permit, for uses that the board determines are industrial, and that person shall not be required to comply with Section 4145.5 or 4146.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 331, Sec. 2.   (AB 1743)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4145.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a pharmacist or physician may, without a prescription or a permit, furnish hypodermic needles and syringes for human use, and a person may, without a prescription or license, obtain hypodermic needles and syringes from a pharmacist or physician for human use, if the furnisher has previously been provided a prescription or other proof of a legitimate medical need requiring a hypodermic needle or syringe to administer a medicine or treatment.
